Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2972.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 10A of chapter 148 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
The fee for an annual inspection of a short-term rental, as defined in section 1 of chapter 64G,
pursuant to section 26J shall not exceed $100 per unit and $500 for a building with 6 units or
more.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 148 of the General Law is hereby further amended by inserting
after section 26I the following section:-
Section 26J. (a) All buildings or structures occupied in whole or in part as a short-term
rental, as defined in section 1 of chapter 64G, and not regulated by sections 26A, 26B or 26C
shall, within 1 year prior to the renting of the building or structure or any dwelling unit thereof,
be inspected for compliance with approved smoke and carbon monoxide detectors as required by
sections 26E and 26F1/2.
of 2

(b) The head of the fire department shall enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. Chapter 186 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 32. A rental or real estate agent, or any platform or website thereof, that lists or
advertises available units for rent shall confirm prior to listing or advertising a unit that the unit:
(i) is in compliance with section 26J of chapter 148; and (ii) has a valid certificate of compliance
for smoke detectors and carbon monoxide detectors dated within 1 year.
SECTION 4. The division of fire safety of the department of fire services may
promulgate any regulations necessary to implement this act.
SECTION 5. This act shall be known as the Maggie Hubbard Rental Safety Act.
of 2